Utah statutes.
10-6-152.   Notice that audit completed and available for inspection.
Within ten days following the receipt of the audit report furnished by the
independent auditor, the city auditor in cities having an auditor and the city
recorder in all other cities shall:
(1)  prepare and publish:
(a) (i)  at least twice in a newspaper of general circulation published within
the county, a notice to the public that the audit of the city has been
completed; or
(ii)  if a newspaper of general circulation is not published within the
county, the notice required by this section may be posted in three public
places; and
(b)  a notice, published in accordance with Section 45-1-101, to the public
that the audit of the city has been completed; and
(2)  make a copy of the notice described in Subsection (1)(a) available for
inspection at the office of the city auditor or recorder.
